Hawaii statutes.
§132-14 Educational powers of county fire
chiefs. The fire chiefs of each county may:

(1) Appoint advisers, promote and secure the
appointment and service of committees of commercial, industrial, labor, civic,
and other organizations, who shall, without compensation, assist the county
fire chief in establishing standards of safety;

(2) Establish and maintain museums and exhibits of
safety and fire prevention in which shall be exhibited equipment, safeguards,
and other means and methods for protection against fire loss, and publish and
distribute bulletins on any phase of this general subject;

(3) Cause lectures to be delivered, illustrated by
stereopticon or other views, diagrams, or pictures, for the information of
owners or other persons and the general public, in regard to the causes and
prevention of fires and related subjects. [L 1917, c 115, pt of §49; RL 1925,
pt of §3463; RL 1935, pt of §6839; am L 1939, c 239, §1(15); RL 1945, §8539; RL
1955, §184-16; HRS §132-16; am and ren L 1978, c 241, §2(17)]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next